src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авжлантир/X
ағдартир/X
ажнабийлаш/X
айблан/X
айлантир/X
айттир/X
активлашиш/X
албанчала/X
аллалаш/X
ангиллат/X
анқайтир/X
ардоқла/X
арқонлат/X
асабийлаш/X
асфальтла/X
ахталантир/X
ая/X
бадтарлаш/X
бақиртир/X
бараварлаштирил/X
баслаш/X
бачкила/X
безанил/X
бекин/X
беллаштир/X
беркиттирил/X
бетоқатлан/X
биғирла/X
биқсит/X
билиш/X
бит/X
блоклан/X
бойитил/X
большевиклаштир/X
бостир/X
бошқарил/X
бўғдиртир/X
бужмай/X
бўйбўйла/X
букла/X
булға/X
бўнакла/X
бурил/X
бўрозлаш/X
бутла/X
бўшаттирил/X
бюрократлаштир/X
вакилла/X
варақлан/X
ваъдалаш/X
висвислаш/X
воронкала/X
галалаш/X
гапир/X
гезарт/X
гилдират/X
гувоҳла/X
гуллаттир/X
гуркира/X
ғағирла/X
ғарибла/X
ғийқилла/X
ғингилла/X
ғиштла/X
ғужла/X
даволан/X
дайдит/X
дангасалан/X
дарралат/X
деёл/X
депсит/X
диккакла/X
дирилла/X
додлаттир/X
дувурлаш/X
дўлай/X
дўпирлаш/X
дўстлашиш/X
егизол/X
ёдлайвер/X
ёйил/X
ёқтириш/X
ёлқинлат/X
емлан/X
енгол/X
ёптир/X
ерлилаштир/X
етказиш/X
ечиниш/X
жавра/X
жалала/X
жарилла/X
жизилла/X
жиллаш/X
жингалаклан/X
жиҳозлан/X
жоҳиллан/X
жўнаштир/X
заифлантир/X
занжирлат/X
заҳарлан/X
зимистонлаш/X
зичлаштирил/X
зўғатала/X
ивиттирил/X
излан/X
икковлаш/X
илдамлат/X
илитил/X
импульсла/X
индексла/X
инқилобийлаш/X
интил/X
ирғишлаш/X
исиш/X
истал/X
ихтисослаштир/X
ичкарила/X
ишланил/X
иярил/X
йиғлаш/X
йироқлаш/X
йуқол/X
йўндиртир/X
кавшан/X
каловлан/X
капла/X
касодлан/X
квоталан/X
келол/X
кепчикла/X
кестир/X
кечир/X
кийдиртир/X
кирит/X
кичиклат/X
коагуляцияла/X
койиш/X
конкретлаш/X
косовла/X
кузатил/X
куйман/X
кукунлан/X
кўмаклашил/X
кўнчит/X
кўр/X
кўркамлан/X
кўтартирил/X
кўчирил/X
қавартир/X
қадрлан/X
қайир/X
қайт/X
қала/X
қалтират/X
қанқай/X
қараттир/X
қас/X
қатнаш/X
қашлан/X
қизғинлаштир/X
қийилла/X
қийпанглаш/X
қилин/X
қинғай/X
қирсилла/X
қисқартир/X
қичиттир/X
қоз/X
қоқтир/X
қониқ/X
қоплан/X
қоронғилат/X
қувватла/X
қувра/X
қўйдиртир/X
қулаш/X
қултуллат/X
қўндир/X
қурайла/X
қўрқимсира/X
қурулла/X
қутлан/X
қўштир/X
лалай/X
ликангла/X
лобарлан/X
локаллан/X
мавжлан/X
мажбурла/X
майиш/X
манмансира/X
махсуслаштир/X
маъқуллаш/X
механизациялан/X
мижғила/X
миллийлаштир/X
минғирла/X
михлаттир/X
молала/X
моторлаш/X
мудра/X
муккай/X
мўлоқлан/X
мўнкиллат/X
мутакаббирлан/X
мушшай/X
намаклан/X
натураллаш/X
нейтраллан/X
ниқтала/X
ништарлан/X
номерла/X
носозлаш/X
нурлантир/X
ободлаш/X
овлаш/X
оғирлан/X
одимлат/X
озиқлан/X
оқиз/X
олайтир/X
олқат/X
оммавийлаштир/X
оппоқлан/X
орлан/X
осилиш/X
оттир/X
очилинқира/X
ошаш/X
пайқа/X
паналан/X
парла/X
пасайтирил/X
пахмайтирил/X
пешла/X
пиликла/X
пирпират/X
пичириш/X
пиширт/X
пойла/X
поралан/X
прогнозлаштир/X
пўнғиллаш/X
пучайтир/X
радионурлан/X
рандала/X
рационаллаштирил/X
ремонтлат/X
роҳатлан/X
савалаш/X
сайлаш/X
салқинлатил/X
сандироқлат/X
сап-сарғай/X
саросималаш/X
сафлаш/X
сез/X
семир/X
сергаклаш/X
сиғ/X
сизил/X
сийпала/X
сиқимла/X
силкила/X
симир/X
синдириш/X
сирачлан/X
сирлаш/X
смолала/X
соғдирил/X
соддалаштирил/X
солмоқла/X
социаллаштир/X
суват/X
суғуртала/X
сузилиш/X
суйкалиш/X
суқиштир/X
сўлит/X
супурил/X
сурғул/X
суркалиш/X
сурулан/X
суюқлаштир/X
суят/X
таёқлаш/X
такаллуфлан/X
тақ/X
тақиқла/X
талат/X
талтангла/X
танбаллаш/X
танқислан/X
тараққийлан/X
тарбияла/X
тарқатил/X
тасарруфла/X
тасрайтир/X
тахминла/X
ташвишсира/X
таъбирлаш/X
таъсирлантирил/X
тегиздир/X
тезлат/X
текширт/X
тентираш/X
тепчиш/X
тиғизлаш/X
тикиш/X
тиликлат/X
тинжира/X
тиргиз/X
тирноқла/X
тишлат/X
тоқатсизлантир/X
топта/X
торт/X
тоширтир/X
тўғнал/X
тўзимсизлан/X
тўқ/X
тўлғазиш/X
тўнал/X
тупукла/X
туртиш/X
тутқиздир/X
туюл/X
ўдағайла/X
ўздиртир/X
ўйиб-ўпир/X
ўкин/X
ўқтал/X
улфатлаш/X
ўнгариш/X
ўпиш/X
урил/X
ўртачала/X
ўтириш/X
уфур/X
учқурлан/X
уяла/X
фойдаланил/X
харжлат/X
хиллаш/X
холила/X
худбинлаш/X
хушлан/X
ҳайратлантир/X
ҳарбийлаш/X
ҳимар/X
ҳошияла/X
ҳурпайиш/X
чайқа/X
чақиштир/X
чалпи/X
чаплаттир/X
чегаралаш/X
чечаклан/X
чийлат/X
чимди/X
чирқира/X
чопил/X
чувран/X
чўккалат/X
чўллат/X
чўчитил/X
шакллан/X
шапатила/X
шаффофлаштир/X
шилдираш/X
шипирла/X
шовдират/X
штамплан/X
шуълалан/X
эзмалан/X
эмаллан/X
эриш/X
эшелонла/X
юзала/X
юмалаш/X
юриш/X
яқинлан/X
ялтангла/X
ярақла/X
ястан/X
